Wisconsin, session 2025, SB993.
do enact as follows:SB993,13Section 1. 443.01 (5m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB993,2,81443.01 (5m) (a) “Practice of interior design” means the design of interior 2spaces as a part of an interior alteration or interior construction project in 3conformity with public health, safety, and welfare requirements, including the 4preparation of documents relating to building code descriptions, project egress 5plans that require no increase in the number of exits in the space affected, space 6planning, finish materials, furnishings, fixtures, and equipment and, the 7preparation of documents and interior technical submissions relating to interior 8construction, and the responsible supervision of the construction thereof.SB993,29Section 2. 443.175 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB993,2,1310443.175 (1) Subject to s. 443.17 (3), a Wisconsin registered interior designer 11may sign and seal interior technical submissions that are required for an interior 12alteration or interior construction project for public record and may supervise 13construction of the interior alteration or interior construction project.SB993,2,1414